cs: Typ uchycení lemovky s třásněmi: Splétaný lem; Šňůrkový lem; Pružný lem; Krajkový lem; Bez lemu (samostatné střapce); Stuhový lem; Tkaná páska; Jiné
nb: Type toppkant på duskkant: Flettet bånd; Snorbånd; Elastisk bånd; Blondebånd; Uten bånd (individuelle dusker); Sløyfebånd; Vevd bånd; Annet
fr: Type de bande de fixation de la frange à pompons: Tête tressée; Tête cordée; Tête élastique; Tête en dentelle; Sans tête (pompons individuels); Tête en ruban; Bande tissée; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de cabeçalho da fita de borlas: Cabeçalho entrançado; Cabeçalho com cordão; Cabeçalho elástico; Cabeçalho de renda; Sem cabeçalho (borlas individuais); Cabeçalho de fita; Fita tecida; Outro
es: Tipo de encabezado con adorno de borla: Cabezal trenzado; Cabezal acordonado; Cabezal elástico; Cabezal de encaje; Sin cabezal (borlas individuales); Cabezal de cinta; Cinta tejida; Otro
bg-BG: Тип горна лента на пискюлната украса: Плетена основа; Основа с шнур; Еластична основа; Дантелена основа; Без основа (отделни пискюли); Основа с панделка; Тъкана лента; Друго
sk-SK: Typ horného zakončenia s dekoratívnym strapcom: Zapletaný okraj; Šnúrový okraj; Elastický okraj; Čipkovaný okraj; Bez okraja (jednotlivé strapce); Stuhový okraj; Tkaná páska; Iné
ko: 태슬 트림 상단부 유형: 브레이드 헤더; 코드 헤더; 신축성 헤더; 레이스 헤더; 헤더 없음(개별 태슬); 리본 헤더; 직조 테이프; 기타
da: Type af topkant for kvastbånd: Flettet overkant; Snoreoverkant; Elastisk overkant; Blondeoverkant; Ingen overkant (individuelle kvaster); Båndoverkant; Vævet bånd; Andet
ja: タッセルトリムヘッダータイプ: 編み込みヘッダー; コードヘッダー; 伸縮ヘッダー; レースヘッダー; ヘッダーなし (個別タッセル); リボンヘッダー; 織りテープ; その他
it: Tipo di parte superiore per il bordo con frange decorative: Intestazione intrecciata; Intestazione con cordino; Intestazione elastica; Intestazione in pizzo; Senza intestazione (nappe individuali); Intestazione a nastro; Nastro intrecciato; Altro
ro-RO: Tip de bandă superioară pentru panglica cu ciucuri: Bordură împletită; Bordură cu șnur; Bordură elastică; Bordură din dantelă; Fără bordură (ciucuri individuali); Bordură tip panglică; Bandă țesută; Altele
zh-CN: 流苏饰边顶部结构类型: 编织穗头; 绳编穗头; 弹性穗头; 蕾丝穗头; 无穗头（单独的流苏）; 丝带穗头; 梭织带; 其他
nl: Kwastfranje header type: Gevlochten rand; Gekoorde rand; Elastische rand; Kanten rand; Geen rand (losse kwastjes); Lintrand; Geweven tape; Overig
pl: Typ brzegu taśmy z frędzlami: Pleciona taśma; Taśma sznurowana; Taśma elastyczna; Taśma koronkowa; Brak taśmy (pojedyncze frędzle); Taśma wstążkowa; Taśma tkana; Inne
th: ส่วนหัวตกแต่งด้วยพู่: แถบถัก; แถบเชือก; แถบยางยืด; แถบลูกไม้; ไม่มีแถบ (พู่เดี่ยว); แถบริบบิ้น; เทปทอ; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 流蘇飾邊頂部類型: 編織頂部; 繩股頂部; 彈性頂部; 蕾絲頂部; 無頂部 (獨立流蘇); 緞帶頂部; 編織帶; 其他
fi: Tupsunauhan kiinnitysreunan tyyppi: Punottu yläreuna; Nyöritetty yläreuna; Joustava yläreuna; Pitsinen yläreuna; Ei yläreunaa (yksittäiset tupsut); Nauhainen yläreuna; Kudottu nauha; Muu
hu: Bojtos szegély rögzítősávjának típusa: Fonott szegély; Zsinóros szegély; Rugalmas szegély; Csipkeszegély; Szegély nélkül (egyedi bojtok); Szalagos szegély; Szőtt szalag; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta zaglavlja s resicama: Pletena traka; Traka s uzicom; Elastična traka; Čipkasta traka; Bez trake (pojedinačne rese); Vrpčasta traka; Tkana traka; Ostalo
lt-LT: Kutų juostos viršutinės tvirtinimo dalies tipas: Pinta tvirtinimo juostelė; Virvelinė tvirtinimo juostelė; Elastinė tvirtinimo juostelė; Nėrinių tvirtinimo juostelė; Be tvirtinimo juostelės (pavieniai kutai); Kaspino tvirtinimo juostelė; Austa juostelė; Kita
en: Tassel trim header type: Braided header; Corded header; Elastic header; Lace header; No header (individual tassels); Ribbon header; Woven tape; Other
ru: Тип верхней кромки бахромы с кисточками: Плетёная тесьма; Шнуровая тесьма; Эластичная тесьма; Кружевная тесьма; Без тесьмы (отдельные кисточки); Ленточная тесьма; Тканая лента; Другое
sl-SI: Vrsta traku/roba cofaste obrobe: Pleten zgornji rob; Zgornji rob z vrvico; Elastičen zgornji rob; Čipkast zgornji rob; Brez zgornjega roba (posamezni čopki); Zgornji rob s trakom; Tkani trak; Drugo
sv: Typ av tofskantshuvud: Flätat fäste; Snörfäste; Elastiskt fäste; Spetsfäste; Utan fäste (enskilda tofsar); Bandfäste; Vävt band; Annat
pt-BR: Guarnição de tassel tipo de cabeçalho: Cabeceira trançada; Cabeceira com cordão; Cabeceira elástica; Cabeceira de renda; Sem cabeceira (franjas individuais); Cabeceira de fita; Fita tecida; Outro
el: Τύπος κεφαλίδας με φούντες: Πλεκτή κεφαλή; Κεφαλή με κορδόνι; Ελαστική κεφαλή; Κεφαλή με δαντέλα; Χωρίς κεφαλή (μεμονωμένες φούντες); Κεφαλή με κορδέλα; Υφαντή ταινία; Άλλο
tr: Püskül şerit üst bant tipi: Örgülü şerit; Kordonlu şerit; Elastik şerit; Dantelli şerit; Şerit yok (bireysel püsküller); Kurdele şerit; Dokuma bant; Diğer
de: Befestigungsart der Quastenborte: Geflochtene Borte; Kordelborte; Elastische Borte; Spitzenborte; Ohne Borte (einzelne Quasten); Bandborte; Gewebtes Band; Sonstige
vi: Kiểu đầu trang trí tua rua: Viền bện; Viền dây thừng; Viền thun; Viền ren; Không có viền (tua rua rời); Viền ruy-băng; Băng dệt; Khác